North Carolina, session 2025, HB1037.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 4 of the Charter of the Town of Belville, being Chapter 84 of
the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4. The regular Regular municipal election elections shall be held in November 1977,
and biennially thereafter for the election of a mayor and the members of the board of
commissioners. in even-numbered years. The election shall be nonpartisan and decided by simple
plurality and held at the time specified in G.S. 163-279(a)(1).
The municipal elections shall be held and conducted by the county board of elections and the
town shall reimburse the county board of elections for the cost thereof except the first election
required to be held herein. thereof. The elections shall be conducted in accordance with the
applicable provisions of Articles 23 and 24 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North
Carolina, except as otherwise provided herein."
SECTION 2. Section 5 of the Charter of the Town of Belville, being Chapter 84 of
the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 5. In the 1977 municipal election and biennially thereafter, the The mayor shall be
elected for a term of two four years. In the 1977 municipal election the two candidates for
commissioner receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of four years, and
the two candidates receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of two
years. Thereafter as the term of each member of the board of commissioners expires, his
successor shall be elected for a term of four years.Members of the board of commissioners shall
be elected for terms of four years on a staggered basis."
SECTION 3. No regular municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Belville in 2027. The terms of office of the mayor and members of the board of commissioners
set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. The terms of office of the members of the
board of commissioners set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Beginning in 2028,
municipal elections shall take place biennially in even-numbered years, pursuant to Section 1 of
this act. Beginning in 2028, the mayor shall serve four-year terms, pursuant to Section 2 of this
act.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections held
on or after that date.
*H1037-v-1*